Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-103.01
University of Nebraska; Board of Regents; districts; numbers; boundaries; established by maps; Clerk of Legislature; Secretary of State; duties.

(1) For the purpose of section 85-103, the state is divided into eight districts. Each district shall be entitled to one regent on the board.

(2) The numbers and boundaries of the districts are designated and established by maps identified and labeled as maps REG21-39003, REG21-39003-1, REG21-39003-2, REG21-39003-3, REG21-39003-4, REG21-39003-5, REG21-39003-6, REG21-39003-7, and REG21-39003-8, filed with the Clerk of the Legislature, and incorporated by reference as part of Laws 2021, LB8, One Hundred Seventh Legislature, First Special Session.

(3)(a) The Clerk of the Legislature shall transfer possession of the maps referred to in subsection (2) of this section to the Secretary of State on October 1, 2021.

(b) When questions of interpretation of district boundaries arise, the maps referred to in subsection (2) of this section in possession of the Secretary of State shall serve as the indication of the legislative intent in drawing the district boundaries.

(c) Each election commissioner or county clerk shall obtain copies of the maps referred to in subsection (2) of this section for the election commissioner's or clerk's county from the Secretary of State.

(d) The Secretary of State shall also have available for viewing on his or her website the maps referred to in subsection (2) of this section identifying the boundaries for the districts.

Laws 1969, c. 847, § 3, p. 3189;

Laws 1971, LB 1035, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 553, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 617, § 2;

Laws 2001, LB 854, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB701, § 1;

Laws 2021, First Spec. Sess., LB8, § 1.

Constitutional provisions, see Article VII, section 10, Constitution of Nebraska.